tests/normal nouns - ending with vowels.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "далай = sea":
    далай<n><nom> : далай
    далай<n><acc> : далайг
    далай<n><abl> : далайгаас
    далай<n><dat> : далайд
    далай<n><pl><nom> : далайнууд

 "нохой = dog":
    нохой<n><nom> : нохой
    нохой<n><acc> : нохойг
    нохой<n><gen> : нохойн
    нохой<n><abl> : нохойгоос
    нохой<n><dat> : нохойд

 "хүү = child":
    хүү<n><nom> : хүү
    хүү<n><acc> : хүүг
    хүү<n><gen> : хүүгийн
    хүү<n><abl> : хүүгээс
    хүү<n><dat> : хүүд
    хүү<n><pl><nom> : хүүхдүүд

 "дүү = younger sibling":
    дүү<n><nom> : дүү
    дүү<n><acc> : дүүг
    дүү<n><gen> : дүүгийн
    дүү<n><abl> : дүүгээс
    дүү<n><dat> : дүүд
    дүү<n><pl><nom> : дүү нар
